test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: lag
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: lag
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [lagi, lag]
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: lags
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: løg
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: løg
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: løgum
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: laga
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: lagið
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: lagið
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: lagnum
    lag+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: lagsins
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: løgini
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: løgini
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: løgunum
    lag+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: laganna
